tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Kablolar > Depolama ve Veri Aktarımı Kabloları: FireWire Kabloları; SAS ve Mini-SAS Kabloları; SATA ve eSATA Kabloları; Seri ve RS-232 Kabloları; Thunderbolt Kabloları; USB Kabloları
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Kabely > Kabely pro ukládání a přenos dat: Kabely FireWire; SAS a Mini-SAS kabely; SATA a eSATA kabely; Sériové a RS-232 kabely; Thunderbolt kabely; Kabely USB
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Kabler > Hukommelses- og dataoverførselskabler: FireWire-kabler; SAS- og Mini-SAS-kabler; SATA- og eSATA-kabler; Serielle kabler og RS-232-kabler; Thunderbolt-kabler; USB-kabler
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Kabeli > Kabeli za pohranu i prijenos podataka: FireWire kabeli; SAS i Mini-SAS kabeli; SATA i eSATA kabeli; Serijski i RS-232 kabeli; Thunderbolt kabeli; USB kabeli
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Καλώδια > Καλώδια αποθήκευσης & μεταφοράς δεδομένων: Καλώδια FireWire; Καλώδια SAS & Mini-SAS; Καλώδια SATA & eSATA; Καλώδια Serial & RS-232; Καλώδια Thunderbolt; Καλώδια USB
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Cavi > Cavi per archiviazione e trasferimento di dati: Cavi FireWire; Cavi SAS e Mini-SAS; Cavi SATA e eSATA; Cavi seriali e RS-232; Cavi Thunderbolt; Cavi USB
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Cabos > Cabos de armazenamento e transferência de dados: Cabos FireWire; Cabos SAS e Mini-SAS; Cabos SATA e eSATA; Cabos de série e RS-232; Cabos thunderbolt; Cabos USB
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Dây cáp > Cáp lưu trữ và truyền dữ liệu: Cáp FireWire; Cáp SAS và Mini-SAS; Cáp SATA và eSATA; Cáp Serial và RS-232; Cáp Thunderbolt; Cáp USB
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Кабели > Кабели для передачи данных: Кабели FireWire; Кабели SAS и Mini-SAS; Кабели SATA и eSATA; Кабели Serial и RS-232; Кабели Thunderbolt; Кабели USB
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 線材 > 資料傳輸線: 火線電纜; SAS 與 Mini-SAS 線材; SATA 與 eSATA 線材; 串列埠與 RS-232 傳輸線; Thunderbolt 傳輸線; USB 連接線
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Kabler > Kabler for lagring og dataoverføring: FireWire-kabler; SAS- og Mini-SAS-kabler; SATA- og eSATA-kabler; Serie- og RS-232-kabler; Thunderbolt-kabler; USB-kabler
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kabeliai > Saugojimo ir duomenų perdavimo kabeliai: „FireWire“ kabeliai; SAS ir Mini-SAS kabeliai; SATA ir eSATA kabeliai; Nuoseklieji (RS‑232) kabeliai; Thunderbolt kabeliai; USB kabeliai
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > สายสัญญาณ > สายจัดเก็บและถ่ายโอนข้อมูล: สายไฟร์ไวร์; สาย SAS และมินิ-SAS; สาย SATA และ eSATA; สายเคเบิล Serial และ RS-232; สายเคเบิล Thunderbolt; สาย USB
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Kable > Kable do przesyłu danych: Kable FireWire; Kable SAS i Mini-SAS; Kable SATA i eSATA; Kable szeregowe (RS-232); Kable Thunderbolt; Kable USB
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Cabluri > Cabluri de stocare și transfer de date: Cabluri FireWire; Cabluri SAS și Mini-SAS; Cabluri SATA și eSATA; Cabluri seriale și RS‑232; Cabluri Thunderbolt; Cabluri USB
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > ケーブル > ストレージ/データ転送ケーブル: FireWireケーブル; SAS・Mini-SASケーブル; SATA・eSATAケーブル; シリアル（RS-232C）ケーブル; Thunderboltケーブル; USBケーブル
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Cables > Cables de almacenamiento y transmisión de datos: Cables FireWire; Cables SAS y Mini-SAS; Cables SATA y eSATA; Cables seriales y RS-232; Cables Thunderbolt; Cables USB
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Кабели > Кабели за съхранение и пренос на данни: FireWire кабели; SAS и Mini-SAS кабели; SATA и eSATA кабели; Серийни кабели и RS-232 кабели; Thunderbolt кабели; USB кабели
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 케이블 > 스토리지/데이터 전송 케이블: 파이어와이어 케이블; SAS 및 Mini-SAS 케이블; SATA 및 eSATA 케이블; 시리얼 및 RS-232 케이블; 썬더볼트 케이블; USB 케이블
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Kaapelit > Tallennus- ja tiedonsiirtokaapelit: FireWire-kaapelit; SAS- ja Mini-SAS-kaapelit; SATA- ja eSATA-kaapelit; Serial- ja RS-232-kaapelit; Thunderbolt-kaapelit; USB-kaapelit
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Kablar > Lagring och dataöverföring: FireWire-kablar; SAS- och Mini-SAS-kablar; SATA- och eSATA-kablar; Seriell- och RS-232-kablar; Thunderbolt-kablar; USB-kablar
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Câbles pour appareils électroniques > Câbles de données: Câbles FireWire; Câbles SAS et Mini-SAS; Câbles SATA et eSATA; Câbles série (RS-232); Câbles Thunderbolt; Câbles USB
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Kabels > Opslag- en gegevensoverdrachtkabels: FireWire-kabels; SAS en Mini-SAS kabels; SATA en eSATA kabels; Seriële en RS-232 kabels; Thunderbolt kabels; USB-kabels
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 线缆 > 存储与数据传输电缆: FireWire 电缆; SAS 与 Mini-SAS 线缆; SATA 与 eSATA 线缆; 串口与 RS-232 线缆; 雷电线缆; USB 电缆
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Cables > Storage & Data Transfer Cables: FireWire Cables; SAS & Mini-SAS Cables; SATA & eSATA Cables; Serial & RS-232 Cables; Thunderbolt Cables; USB Cables
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Kabel > Datenübertragungs- & Speicherkabel: FireWire-Kabel; SAS- und Mini-SAS-Kabel; SATA- und eSATA-Kabel; Serielle und RS-232-Kabel; Thunderbolt-Kabel; USB-Kabel
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Káble > Káble na uchovávanie a prenos dát: FireWire káble; SAS a Mini-SAS káble; SATA a eSATA káble; Sériové a RS-232 káble; Thunderbolt káble; USB káble
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Kabli > Kabli za shranjevanje in prenos podatkov: FireWire kabli; SAS in Mini-SAS kabli; SATA in eSATA kabli; Serijski in RS-232 kabli; Thunderbolt kabli; Kabli USB
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Kábelek > Tároló- és adatátviteli kábelek: FireWire kábelek; SAS- és Mini-SAS-kábelek; SATA és eSATA-kábelek; Soros és RS-232-kábelek; Thunderbolt-kábelek; USB kábelek
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Cabos > Cabos para armazenamento e transferência de dados: Cabos FireWire; Cabos SAS e mini-SAS; Cabos SATA e eSATA; Cabos seriais e RS-232; Cabos Thunderbolt; Cabos USB